Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska90-266
Buffalo County; grant permanent easement.

Buffalo County, Nebraska, shall grant a permanent easement across the real estate described in section 90-265 to Emil J. Obermiller and Vicki L. Obermiller for the purpose of access to the Obermiller's property adjacent to such real estate. Emil J. Obermiller and Vicki L. Obermiller shall grant a permanent easement on such adjacent real estate to Buffalo County, Nebraska, and the city of Ravenna, for recreational trail purposes, on one hundred feet from the northernmost boundary to the south and the entire width from east to west of such one hundred feet, of the real estate situated in Buffalo County, Nebraska, and described on microfilm roll 94, pages 2946 and 2947, in the records of the Buffalo County Register of Deeds.

Laws 1996, LB 1070, § 2.